California statutes. Water Code
A district may, by resolution of the board, provide a procedure for and collect charges and fees, by way of the tax bills of the county or counties in which such district is located. A district may also collect assessments levied under Part 7 (commencing with Section 51200) of the division by way of the tax bills of the county or counties in which such district is located. Such charges and fees or assessments shall appear as a separate item on the tax bill, shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county ad valorem property taxes are collected, and shall be subject to the same penalties and the same procedure and sale in case of delinquency as provided for such taxes. The district shall, on or before August 1st of each year, certify to the county auditor the charges and fees or assessments to be collected. The county may deduct from the revenue so collected for the district an appropriate amount for the billing and collection services rendered to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 153, Sec. 1.   Effective June 11, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

50905.

The Edgerly Island Reclamation District may provide for the disposal of sewage, industrial waste, or other waste and, for that purpose, may design, finance, construct, operate, and maintain sewage treatment works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1048, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

50906.

(a) A reclamation district specified in subdivision (d) may construct, maintain, and operate a plant for the generation of hydroelectric power, together with transmission lines for the conveyance thereof and with other facilities that may be necessary or appropriate for the construction, maintenance, and operation of that plant. Construction of the plant and transmission lines may be financed by the issuance of time warrants pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 53040) of Chapter 1 of Part 9 to pay the cost of construction of the plant, transmission lines, and related facilities, except that the board may, by resolution, provide for the payment of those time warrants solely from the proceeds derived from the operation of the hydroelectric
 powerplant, in lieu of the assessment described in Section 53040, and may, in that event, pledge the plant, transmission lines, and related facilities and the revenues from the operation of the hydroelectric powerplant as the sole security for the payment of the time warrants.

(b) The hydroelectric powerplant, transmission lines, and related facilities constructed pursuant to this section may be leased for operation to, or the power generated may be sold to, a public utility or public agency engaged in the distribution, use, or sale of electricity, but shall not be offered for sale directly by the district to customers other than a public utility or public agency.

(c) Proceeds from the sale of electricity shall be used to retire any time warrants issued for construction of the
 facilities and otherwise for the powers and purposes for which the district was formed.

(d) This section applies only to the following reclamation districts:

(1) Reclamation District No. 1004 acting in conjunction with the County of Colusa.

(2) Reclamation District No. 108.

(e) Reclamation District No. 108 shall submit to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Local Government, on or before January 1, 2031, and between January 1, 2035, and January 1, 2036, a report containing the following information:

(1) Whether the district has obtained permission from the Colusa Local Agency Formation Commission to enact its hydroelectric authority.

(2) (A) Whether the district is using its hydroelectric authority or has plans to use its hydroelectric authority.

(B) If the district is using its hydroelectric
 authority
 or has plans to use its hydroelectric authority, the report shall include the following information: 

(i) The status of the project.

(ii) Financial statements related to the selling of hydroelectric power.

(iii) An estimated date for the use of its hydroelectric authority.

(3) If the district is not currently using its hydroelectric authority, regardless of whether the district has plans to use its hydroelectric authority, the reasons for not using that authority.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 371, Sec. 30) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 141, Sec. 1.   (AB 59)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

50907.

All districts formed under this division or under a special act of the Legislature and authorized to act, under this division, shall be subject to the requirements for competitive bidding under Article 60.5 (commencing with Section 20920) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1042, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Irrigation [50910. - 50914.]

50910.

A district may acquire, take or hold by gift, purchase, conditional sales contract, lease, condemnation, or other legal means, and maintain and operate the whole or any part of any irrigation system through which any lands in the district and lands contiguous thereto may be supplied with water for irrigation, including water rights, dams, diversion works, rights of way, canals, pumps and all property or things, real or personal, incidental thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50911.

When a district has adopted plans for the irrigation of district lands it may:

(a) Adopt rules and regulations for the distribution of water.

(b) Adopt a schedule of rates to be charged by the district for furnishing water for the irrigation of district lands. The schedule of rates may include standby charges to holders of title to land to which water may be made available, whether the water is actually used or not. The standby charge shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20) per year for each acre of land or for a parcel less than one acre, unless the standby charge is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(c) If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby charge was established were followed, the district may, by resolution, continue the charge pursuant to this section in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the district shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(d) Collect the charges from the persons to or for whom the water was furnished and from the holders of title to land to which water has been made available, whether used or not.

(e) Sue for the recovery of the unpaid charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

50912.

A district, upon payment of and compliance with such tolls, rates, and regulations as the board may adopt, may furnish through its irrigation works, water for irrigation of district lands, and may furnish, to nondistrict land contiguous to the district, water where it can be furnished through canals or ditches which may be used for the irrigation of lands within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50913.

Moneys collected by the board for irrigation charges pursuant to Section 50911, when deposited in the county treasury shall be credited to the “irrigation fund.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50914.

Money deposited in an “irrigation fund” shall be disbursed only on orders or warrants of the board in payment of the expense or cost of irrigation or irrigation works constructed by the district, or incidental expenses incurred in connection therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Property [50930. - 50933.]

50930.

A district may acquire, by purchase, condemnation, gift, lease or other legal means, such real or personal property as is necessary for accomplishing the purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50931.

A district may sell, convey, transfer, lease, or otherwise dispose of such of its property as the board determines is no longer necessary for the construction, maintenance or operation of the reclamation works of the district, and lease or operate for hire any district tools or machinery not at the time needed by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50932.

A district may construct, maintain and operate such drains, canals, sluices, bulkheads, water gates, levees, embankments, pumping plants, dams, diversion works, or irrigation works, and all things reasonably necessary or convenient for accomplishing the purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50933.

A district may construct, maintain, and operate ferry boats, bridges, road systems, and related facilities to provide access to the district’s levee, drainage, and irrigation systems, and to provide access to the lands within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 268, Sec. 1.   Effective August 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Office, Records and Documents [50940. - 50942.]

50940.

Unless otherwise provided by law the district shall keep an office in the principal county or in a county contiguous thereto for the transaction of the business of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50941.

All district books, maps, papers, records, contracts and other documents shall be kept in the office and be open to inspection during all business hours by any person interested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50942.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Personnel [50950. - 50959.]

50950.

A district may employ engineers and others to survey, plan, locate and report on the works necessary for the reclamation of the lands of the district, and estimate the cost thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50951.

A district may obtain such professional and other services as is necessary to accomplish the purposes of the district and may employ such assistance as the board deems necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

50952.

A district may employ an expert in agriculture and related matters and such assistants as may be deemed necessary to do any of the following:

(a) Supervise the construction of works for the irrigation or protection of district lands.

(b) Advise landowners, or any person engaged in farming district land, of methods of increasing the productiveness of such land or as to any matters of husbandry.

(c) Conduct experiments as prescribed by the board.

(d) Perform duties for the general welfare of the people of the district as prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50953.

A district issuing warrants or levying or collecting assessments may employ a clerk who, under the direction of the county treasurer, shall attend to matters pertaining to the registration and payment of warrants and to the levying and collecting of assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

50954.

The clerk shall receive for his or her services a yearly sum equal to one and one-half cents ($0.015) per acre based on the net acreage of the district as indicated by the records of the district, or, if the net acreage is not obtainable from the records of the district, based upon the records of the county elections official or, if the district has outstanding bonds it shall pay the clerk three cents ($0.03) per acre.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 177.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

50955.

Each claim for clerk hire must be approved by the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50956.

The board, upon presentation of a proper claim, shall draw semiannually a warrant on the district funds for such clerk hire.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50957.

If the board neglects or refuses to draw a warrant based upon a proper claim for clerk hire, 10 percent of the amount of the claim shall be added thereto, and thereafter 2 percent per month shall be added to the claim until a warrant is issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

50958.

No county officer shall charge or receive any fee for services which he is required to perform in relation to the registration and payment of warrants or the collection of assessments but reasonable and necessary expense actually incurred by a county treasurer in connection with such acts shall be paid out of the funds of the districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

50959.

No member of any board of supervisors, or clerk of such board, shall receive compensation, other than his regular salary, for services performed pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Co-operation With the United States [50970. - 50979.]

50970.

A district may co-operate and contract with the United States, under the Federal Reclamation Act of June 17, 1902, and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto or any act of Congress heretofore or hereafter enacted permitting co-operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1111.)
-------------------------------------------

50971.

The co-operation and contract may be for any or all of the following purposes:

(a) Construction, acquisition, purchase, extension, operation or maintenance of works and facilities for irrigation, storage, drainage, flood control or either or any of these, or the use or enjoyment of any such works or facilities, or any rights or interests therein.

(b) A water supply.

(c) Assumption as principal or guarantor of indebtedness to the United States. 

(d) To receive or borrow money from the United States and provide for the repayment thereof, for the purpose of constructing projects, distribution systems or other works for the district or for any distribution district or improvement district formed therein, which said works shall be used for the storage, regulation, control, development and distribution of water for irrigation of land or for the use, control and distribution of drainage water within the district or for flood control purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1111.)
-------------------------------------------

50972.

A district may carry out and perform the terms of any contract so made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1111.)
-------------------------------------------

50973.

A proposal to enter into a contract with the United States under terms of this chapter shall be authorized at an election. The board, by order entered upon its records, shall order a special election to be held at some place in the district to be designated by the board, and at such special election the board shall submit to the landowners the question of whether the contract shall be entered into by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1111.)
-------------------------------------------

50974.

Proceedings at the election shall be had insofar as applicable in the manner provided in the case of elections provided for in Chapter 3 (commencing at Section 50800) of Part 4 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1111.)
-------------------------------------------

50975.

Notice of the election shall specify:

(a) The time and place of election.

(b) The purpose of the election.

(c) A brief statement of the general purpose of the contract.

(d) The amount of money to be paid to the United States under the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1111.)
-------------------------------------------

50976.

The ballots at the election shall contain a brief statement of the general purpose of the contract substantially as stated in the notice of election and the amount of money to be paid to the United States under the contract. To the right of or below the statement, the words “yes” and “no” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 61.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

50977.

The board may execute the contract on behalf of the district if a majority of the votes cast at the election favor the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1111.)
-------------------------------------------

50978.

Without limiting the generality of Section 50971, when a contract has been executed with the United States under this chapter, the board may, by resolution, provide for an assessment upon the land to be benefited by such contract to pay all or any portion of the amounts to become due under the contract. Such assessment may be levied and collected in the same manner as any other district assessment might be levied and collected, as deemed appropriate by the board.

As an alternative to such levy of an assessment, or in addition thereto, the board may derive all or a portion of the amounts to be paid to the United States under the contract by the collection of charges from the persons to or for whom the water was furnished, under the provisions of Section 50911.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1111.)
-------------------------------------------

50979.

An action to determine the validity of any contract may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1533.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. RECLAMATION PLANS [51000. - 51040.]



  CHAPTER 1. Adoption [51000. - 51003.]

51000.

A district may adopt an original plan for the reclamation of district lands, and an estimate of the cost thereof, and may modify or change such original plans, or adopt new, supplemental, or additional plans when necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51001.

The plan and estimate may include reclamation works already constructed or in course of construction, and payments therefor may be made to the person who constructed them or to the grantee of the lands for the benefit of which the reclamation works were constructed by the owner of the lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51002.

The plan and estimate may include any irrigation works which the district is empowered to acquire.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51003.

The board shall report to the board of supervisors every original plan, and every new, supplemental or additional plan for the reclamation of district lands in the manner provided in Sections 51020 and 51040.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Approval [51020. - 51040.]



  ARTICLE 1. Districts Within the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District [51020. - 51030.]

51020.

If any part of a district is located within the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District the board of trustees shall report each plan for the reclamation of district lands to the board of supervisors by filing, with the county clerk, three copies thereof with the estimate of the cost of the contemplated reclamation works, including incidental expenses, maintenance and repair necessary for the reclamation of the district lands in pursuance of such plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51021.

Within five days after the copies of the plan and estimate are filed with the county clerk he shall certify two of the copies and transmit them to the Secretary of the Reclamation Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51022.

Upon receipt of the certified copies of the plan, the Secretary of the Reclamation Board shall immediately set a date when the Reclamation Board will hold a hearing for considering any objections thereto, which hearing shall be held not less than 20, nor more than 60 days after the Secretary of the Reclamation Board received the certified copies of the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51023.

The Secretary of the Reclamation Board shall publish a notice of the hearing once a week for two weeks in some newspaper of general circulation published within the district, or, if no newspaper is published within the district, then in the county seat of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51024.

The notice shall be in substantially the following form:

“Notice to the landowners of reclamation district No. ____. Notice is hereby given to the landowners of reclamation district No. ____ that there has been filed with the county clerk of the County of ____ and with the Secretary of the Reclamation Board, an original (supplemental or new, as the case may be) plan for the reclamation of lands of the district; that the Reclamation Board will hold a meeting at its office in the City of Sacramento, County of Sacramento, State of California, on the ____ day of ____, 19__, at ____ o’clock, at which time any interested party may appear and object to the said plan.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51025.

At the hearing the Reclamation Board shall hear any evidence offered with respect to the plan, and thereafter shall approve, modify, amend or reject the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51026.

The Reclamation Board shall not modify, amend or reject any plan on the ground that the plan provides for a levee which in its judgment is of excessive strength either in height, slopes or crown width, but no claim for compensation shall thereafter be made against the Reclamation Board or the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District for any part of the levees which the Reclamation Board considers in excess of what is required to comply with its plans for flood control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51027.

The Reclamation Board may continue the hearing from time to time and may cause such investigation and report of the plan to be made by the engineers connected with the Reclamation Board or by such other competent authority as the board deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51028.

When the Reclamation Board has approved, modified, or rejected any reclamation plan after a hearing as provided in this article, such action shall be final, and the sufficiency of the plan shall not be subject to attack before the reclamation board or in any court, but nothing in this section shall prevent the board from filing with the county clerk any amendatory, additional or supplemental plan of reclamation at any time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51029.

When an amendatory, additional or supplemental plan is filed with the county clerk, two certified copies thereof shall be transmitted to the Secretary of the Reclamation Board and thereafter the same proceedings shall be had, and with like effect, with respect to such plan as are provided for the original plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51030.

No city or county shall proceed with the reclamation of any lands located within the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District until the provisions of this article have been complied with.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2122.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Districts Outside the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District [51040. - 51040.]

51040.

If no part of a district is within the boundaries of the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District, the board shall report each plan for reclamation of district lands to the board of supervisors by filing with the county clerk two copies thereof with an estimate of the cost of the contemplated works, including incidental expenses, maintenance and repairs, necessary for the reclamation of district lands pursuant to the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. ASSESSMENTS [51200. - 51894.]



  CHAPTER 1. Miscellaneous Provisions [51200. - 51207.]

51200.

The assessments levied by a district shall include all lands and rights of way within the district, owned by the State or by any city, county, public corporation, or utility district formed under the laws of the State other than public roads, highways, and school districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51201.

The assessments upon those lands or rights of way shall be levied in proportion to the benefits in the same manner as assessments are levied upon other lands or rights of way within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51202.

The governing body of the State, city, county, public corporation, or any utility district formed under the laws of this State owning land or rights of way on which an assessment has been levied by a district, shall pay the assessment before it becomes delinquent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51203.

No land or rights of way owned by the State, or any city, county, public corporation, or any utility district formed under the laws of the State shall be sold for nonpayment of an assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51204.

A district may take the procedure prescribed by Chapter 2, Title 1, Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure to compel the payment of any assessment lawfully levied by it upon the land or rights of way within the district belonging to the State, or any city, county, public corporation, or any utility district formed under the laws of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51205.

When any parcel appearing on an assessment list is deeded in whole, the board may, by a minute order, cause to be made such changes in the assessment list as are necessary to show the name of the new owner, as it appears on the record of the tax rolls of the county in which the land is situated, and shall file notice of all such changes with the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51206.

(a) Prior to the levy of any installment upon an original or additional assessment, or the levy of an operation and maintenance assessment, in one or more installments, by a district pursuant to this division, notice shall be given by publication once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the principal county of the intent to levy an installment or operation and maintenance assessment, together with the time and place for a public hearing to be held by the board to consider and adopt an installment or assessment levy.

(b) If an installment upon an original or additional assessment or an operation and maintenance assessment levy has been approved by the board at a noticed public hearing, notice of subsequent installments or operation and maintenance assessments shall be required only if the amount of the installment or assessment levy is proposed to be increased.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 38, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

51207.

Any costs associated with notices, public hearings, or filing charges with the board required pursuant to this division shall be recovered through charges, fees, or assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 38, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Levy of Assessments [51230. - 51485.]



  ARTICLE 1. Original Assessments [51230. - 51260.]

51230.

When a plan of reclamation has been adopted by a district located entirely outside the boundaries of the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District the board of supervisors shall appoint three assessment commissioners, who have no interest in any real estate within the district, each of whom, before entering upon his duties, shall make and subscribe an oath that he is not in any manner interested in any real estate within the district, directly or indirectly, and that he will perform the duties of a commissioner to the best of his ability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51231.

The assessment commissioners shall view and assess upon the district land the sum estimated to be the cost of the reclamation plan, and shall apportion the sum according to the benefits that will accrue to each parcel by reason of the expenditures of the sums of money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51232.

The assessment shall be collected and paid into the county treasury in the manner provided in Chapter 3 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51233.

Money collected on assessments levied pursuant to Section 51231 shall be paid out for reclamation works upon the warrants of the board of trustees, approved by the board of supervisors, or, if bonds of the district have been issued upon the assessment, shall be deposited in a separate fund for the sole purpose of paying principal and interest on the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51234.

When any part of the district is located within the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District, and the reclamation board has approved the reclamation plan, the board shall so report to the board of supervisors, stating the estimated cost of the reclamation works, and petitioning the board of supervisors to appoint three assessment commissioners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51235.

Upon receipt of the petition from the board, the board of supervisors shall appoint assessment commissioners within 60 days, who shall qualify in the manner provided in Section 51230.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51236.

The assessment commissioners shall assess the estimated cost of the reclamation plan upon the district land in the manner provided in Section 51231.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51237.

The sums assessed shall be collected in the manner provided in Chapter 3 of this part and paid into the county treasury to the credit of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51238.

The money collected on assessments levied pursuant to Section 51236 shall be paid out for the reclamation works upon the warrants of the trustees, or, if bonds of the district have been issued upon the assessment, shall be deposited in a separate fund for the sole purpose of paying principal and interest on the bonds and the expenses of the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51239.

The assessment commissioners appointed pursuant to Sections 51230 and 51235 shall make a list of the charges assessed against each parcel, containing:

(a) A description of each parcel assessed, by legal subdivisions, swamp-land surveys, or other boundaries sufficient to identify the same.

(b) A statement as to the number of acres in each parcel.

(c) The names of the owners of each parcel, if known, and if unknown, that fact.

(d) A statement as to the amount of the charge assessed against each parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51240.

If the list of charges contains any error in the description of the land or the name of the owner, or if any land which should be assessed is omitted from the list, or if there is an error in any other respect, the assessment commissioners may correct the list at any time before it is approved by the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51241.

No error in the list of charges assessed shall render the assessment of a parcel invalid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51242.

The list of charges assessed, when completed, shall be filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51243.

Upon receipt of the list of charges, the board of supervisors shall appoint a time when it will meet for the purpose of hearing any objections to the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51244.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication once a week for two successive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation published in the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51245.

Any time before the hearing, any person interested in land upon which any charge has been assessed may file a written objection to the assessment, which shall state the grounds of objections and be verified by the affidavit of the person objecting, or some other person who is familiar with the facts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51246.

No objection shall be considered by the board of supervisors, or allowed in any other action or proceeding, unless it is made in writing to the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51247.

At the hearing the board of supervisors shall hear any evidence offered in support of written objections and may modify or amend the assessment, or make a reapportionment of the entire assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51248.

If the amount of any assessment in the list is changed, the board of supervisors shall set a day for hearing objections to the assessment as changed, and shall publish notice of the hearing as provided in Section 51244.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51249.

At the hearing on the changes in the assessment an objection in writing may be made by any person interested, and the board of supervisors shall proceed to hear that objection in the same manner as upon the original hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51250.

If the amount of any assessment is again changed the board of supervisors shall proceed as before to give notice and to hear objections to the changes, and shall proceed in a similar manner until the amount of each assessment is finally fixed and approved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51251.

The board of supervisors shall then make an order approving the assessment, and shall endorse the order upon the assessment list.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51252.

The endorsement shall be signed by the chairman of the board of supervisors and attested by the clerk thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51253.

The decision of the board of supervisors in approving the assessment list is final, and thereafter the endorsed assessment list is conclusive evidence that the charges were levied according to law, except in an action commenced pursuant to Section 51259.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51254.

The assessment list shall be prepared in duplicate, and one original shall be retained in the office of the district, and the second original shall be filed with the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51255.

If the district is situated in more than one county, a copy of the assessment list certified by the county treasurer, shall be filed with the treasurer of each of the other counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51256.

When the second original assessment list is filed as provided in Section 51254, the charges assessed thereby upon parcels constitute a lien thereon, and the filing constitutes notice thereof to all persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51257.

The lien of an unpaid assessment upon which bonds have been issued continues until the bonds, and any refunding bonds which have been issued, are paid in full, except as provided in reference to the use of bonds as payment of assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51258.

No subsequent act or conduct of the board shall invalidate an assessment after it becomes a lien, and the board may be compelled by mandate, or other proper proceeding, to perform its duties as required by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51259.

At any time within 30 days after the assessment list is filed with the county treasurer, any person aggrieved by the decision of the board of supervisors in approving the list may commence an action in the superior court of the principal county to have the list corrected, modified or annulled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51260.

If the action is not commenced within 30 days, no action or defense shall thereafter be maintained attacking the legality of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Additional Assessments [51300. - 51302.]

51300.
